Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1 Annexation
6-51-108. Rights of residents of annexed territory — Plan of service and progress report.

Residents of, and persons owning property in, annexed territory shall be entitled to rights and privileges of citizenship, in accordance with the annexing municipality's charter, immediately upon annexation as though such annexed territory had always been a part of the annexing municipality. It shall be the duty of the governing body to put into effect with respect to an annexed area any charter provisions relating to representation on the governing body.

This subsection (b) shall apply to any municipality whose annexation ordinance becomes effective by court order pursuant to § 6-51-103(d).

Within ten (10) days after the date on which a court order is entered sustaining the validity of a proposed annexation, any annexing municipality to which this subsection (b) applies shall submit written notification, meeting the requirements of subdivision (b)(3), to each person owning real property in the territory that the territory will become a part of the municipality. In the event an appeal is taken from the court order, the annexing municipality shall notify the property owners in writing of the pending appeal. If on appeal the court affirms the validity of the proposed annexation, the municipality shall submit written notification, meeting the requirements of subdivision (b)(3), to the property owners within ten (10) days of entry of judgment of the appellate court.

The advance written notification shall include the date on which the annexed territory becomes a part of the municipality, a detailed description of the annexed territory, and the reasons for the annexation. The notification shall be sent by first class mail to the last known address listed in the office of the property assessor for each property owner of record within the annexed territory.

A person with personal knowledge of the mailing of the notification shall submit a notarized affidavit to the presiding officer of the annexing municipality attesting that the notifications were mailed in accordance with subdivision (b)(3).

Upon the expiration of six (6) months from the date any annexed territory for which a plan of service has been adopted becomes a part of the annexing municipality, and annually thereafter until services have been extended according to such plan, there shall be prepared and published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality a report of the progress made in the preceding year toward extension of services according to such plan, and any changes proposed therein. The governing body of the municipality shall publish notice of a public hearing on such progress reports and changes, and hold such hearing thereon. Any owner of property in an annexed area to which such plan and progress report are applicable may file a suit for mandamus to compel the governing body to comply with the requirements of this subsection (c).

A municipality may amend a plan of services by resolution of the governing body only after a public hearing for which notice has been published at least fifteen (15) days in advance in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality when:

The amendment is reasonably necessary due to natural disaster, act of war, act of terrorism, or reasonably unforeseen circumstances beyond the control of the municipality;

The amendment does not materially or substantially decrease the type or level of services or substantially delay the provision of services specified in the original plan; or

The amendment:

Proposes to materially and substantially decrease the type or level of services under the original plan or to substantially delay those services;

Is not justified under subdivision (d)(1); and

Has received the approval in writing of a majority of the property owners by parcel in the area annexed. In determining a majority of property owners, a parcel of property with more than one (1) owner shall be counted only once and only if owners comprising a majority of the ownership interests in the parcel petition together as the owner of the particular parcel.

An aggrieved property owner in the annexed territory may bring an action in the appropriate court of equity jurisdiction to enforce the plan of services at any time after one hundred eighty (180) days after an annexation takes effect and until the plan of services is fulfilled, and may bring an action to challenge the legality of an amendment to a plan of services if such action is brought within thirty (30) days after the adoption of the amendment to the plan of services. If the court finds that the municipality has amended the plan of services in an unlawful manner, then the court shall decree the amendment null and void and shall reinstate the previous plan of services. If the court finds that the municipality has materially and substantially failed to comply with its plan of services for the territory in question, then the municipality shall be given the opportunity to show cause why the plan of services was not carried out. If the court finds that the municipality's failure is due to natural disaster, act of war, act of terrorism, or reasonably unforeseen circumstances beyond the control of the municipality that materially and substantially impeded the ability of the municipality to carry out the plan of services, then the court shall alter the timetable of the plan of services so as to allow the municipality to comply with the plan of services in a reasonable time and manner. If the court finds that the municipality's failure was not due to natural disaster, act of war, act of terrorism, or reasonably unforeseen circumstances beyond the control of the municipality that materially and substantially impeded the ability of the municipality to carry out the plan of services, then the court shall issue a writ of mandamus to compel the municipality to provide the services contained in the plan, shall establish a timetable for the provision of the services in question, and shall enjoin the municipality from any further annexations until the services subject to the court's order have been provided to the court's satisfaction, at which time the court shall dissolve its injunction. If the court determines that the municipality has failed without cause to comply with the plan of services or has unlawfully amended its plan of services, the court shall assess the costs of the suit against the municipality.

Acts 1955, ch. 113, § 6; 1974, ch. 753, §§ 3, 8, 9; T.C.A., § 6-315; Acts 1998, ch. 1101, § 21; 2013, ch. 462, § 1; 2015, ch. 512, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18 provided that the act take effect at 12:01 a.m. on May 16, 2015. However, the governor signed the act and it became law on May 20, 2015. Pursuant to Article II, § 20, of the Constitution of Tennessee, the act takes effect 40 days after the bill became law. Thus, the effective date of the act is June 29, 2015.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “by ordinance” following “annexation” in the first sentence of (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18. June 29, 2015 [See the Compiler's Notes.].

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 17.

6-51-109. Annexation of smaller municipality by larger municipality.

Upon receipt of a petition in writing of twenty percent (20%) of the qualified voters of a smaller municipality, voting at the last general election, such petition to be filed with the chief executive officer of the smaller municipality who shall promptly submit the petition to the chief executive officer of the larger municipality, such larger municipality may annex such portion of the territory of the smaller municipality described in the petition or the totality of such smaller municipality if so described in the petition only after a majority of the qualified voters voting in an election in such smaller municipality vote in favor of the annexation.

The county election commission shall hold such an election on the request and at the expense of the larger municipality, the results of which shall be certified to each municipality.

If a majority of the qualified voters voting in such election are in favor of annexation, the corporate existence of such smaller municipality shall end within thirty (30) days after the certification of the election results, and all of the choses in action, including the right to collect all uncollected taxes, and all other assets of every kind and description of the smaller municipality shall be taken over by and become the property of the larger municipality. All legally subsisting liabilities, including any bonded indebtedness, of the smaller municipality shall be assumed by the larger municipality, which shall thereafter have as full jurisdiction over the territory of the smaller municipality as over that lying within the existing corporate limits of the larger municipality.

Acts 1955, ch. 113, § 7; T.C.A., § 6-316; Acts 1987, ch. 31, § 1; 2015, ch. 512, §§ 13, 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18 provided that the act take effect at 12:01 a.m. on May 16, 2015. However, the governor signed the act and it became law on May 20, 2015. Pursuant to Article II, § 20, of the Constitution of Tennessee, the act takes effect 40 days after the bill became law. Thus, the effective date of the act is June 29, 2015.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “by ordinance” preceding “annex” near the middle of (a) and substituted “certification of the election results” for “adoption of the ordinance by the larger municipality” in the first sentence of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18. June 29, 2015 [See the Compiler's Notes.].

6-51-110. Priority of municipalities in annexation.

Nothing in this part and § 6-51-301 shall be construed to authorize annexation proceedings by a smaller municipality with respect to territory within the corporate limits of a larger municipality nor, except in counties having a population of not less than sixty-five thousand (65,000) nor more than sixty-six thousand (66,000) and counties having a population of four hundred thousand (400,000) or more, according to the federal census of 1970 or any subsequent federal census, and except in counties having a metropolitan form of government, by a larger municipality with respect to territory within the corporate limits of a smaller municipality in existence for ten (10) or more years. Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, in counties of this state having a population of not less than two hundred seventy-six thousand (276,000) nor more than two hundred seventy-seven thousand (277,000), according to the federal census of 1970 or any subsequent federal census, nothing in this part shall be construed to authorize annexation proceedings by a larger municipality with respect to territory within the corporate limits of any smaller municipality in existence at the time of the proposed annexation.

If two (2) municipalities that were incorporated in the same county shall initiate annexation proceedings with respect to the same territory, the proceedings of the municipality having the larger population shall have precedence and the smaller municipality's proceedings shall be held in abeyance pending the outcome of the proceedings of such larger municipality.

If two (2) municipalities that were incorporated in different counties shall initiate annexation proceedings with respect to the same territory, the proceedings of the municipality that was incorporated in the same county in which the territory to be annexed is located shall have precedence and the other municipality's proceedings shall be held in abeyance pending the outcome of the proceedings of the municipality that was incorporated in the same county as the territory to be annexed.

Except in counties having a population of not less than sixty-five thousand (65,000) nor more than sixty-six thousand (66,000) and counties having a population of four hundred thousand (400,000) or more, according to the federal census of 1970 or any subsequent federal census, and except in counties having a metropolitan form of government, annexation proceedings shall be considered as initiated upon passage on first reading of an ordinance of annexation.

[Deleted by 2015 amendment]

When a larger municipality initiates annexation proceedings for a territory that could be subject to annexation by a smaller municipality, the smaller municipality shall have standing to challenge the proceedings in the chancery court of the county where the territory proposed to be annexed is located.

[Deleted by 2015 amendment]

Acts 1955, ch. 113, § 8; 1969, ch. 136, § 2; 1974, ch. 753, §§ 5, 8, 9; 1978, ch. 684, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-317; Acts 1980, ch. 833, § 1; 2015, ch. 512, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18 provided that the act take effect at 12:01 a.m. on May 16, 2015. However, the governor signed the act and it became law on May 20, 2015. Pursuant to Article II, § 20, of the Constitution of Tennessee, the act takes effect 40 days after the bill became law. Thus, the effective date of the act is June 29, 2015.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted (e) which read, “(e) If the ordinance of annexation of the larger municipality does not receive final approval within one hundred eighty (180) days after having passed its first reading, the proceeding shall be void and a smaller municipality shall have priority with respect to annexation of the territory; provided, that its annexation ordinance shall likewise be adopted upon final passage within one hundred eighty (180) days after having passed its first reading.” and (g) which read, “(g) A smaller municipality may, by ordinance, extend its corporate limits by annexation of any contiguous territory, when such territory within the corporate limits of a larger municipality is less than seventy-five (75) acres in area, is not populated, is separated from the larger municipality by a limited access express highway, its access ramps or service roads, and is not the site of industrial plant development. The provisions of this chapter relative to the adoption of a plan of service and the submission of same to a local planning commission, if there be such, shall not be required of the smaller municipality for such annexation.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18. June 29, 2015 [See the Compiler's Notes.].

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 18, 100; 21 Tenn. Juris., Quo Warranto, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Municipal Annexation in Tennessee, 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 651 (1980).

Attorney General Opinions. Annexation priorities, 98-0148, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 148 (8/12/98).

Annexation under metropolitan form of government. OAG 10-109, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 115 (10/28/10).

6-51-111. Municipal property and services.

Upon referendum approval of an annexation resolution as provided in this part, an annexing municipality and any affected instrumentality of the state, including, but not limited to, a utility district, sanitary district, school district, or other public service district, shall attempt to reach agreement in writing for allocation and conveyance to the annexing municipality of any or all public functions, rights, duties, property, assets and liabilities of such state instrumentality that justice and reason may require in the circumstances. Any and all agreements entered into before March 8, 1955, relating to annexation shall be preserved. The annexing municipality, if and to the extent that it may choose, shall have the exclusive right to perform or provide municipal and utility functions and services in any territory that it annexes, notwithstanding § 7-82-301 or any other statute, subject, however, to the provisions of this section with respect to electric cooperatives.

Subject to such exclusive right, any such matters upon which the respective parties are not in agreement in writing within sixty (60) days after the operative date of such annexation shall be settled by arbitration with the laws of arbitration of this state effective at the time of submission to the arbitrators, and § 29-5-101(2) shall not apply to any arbitration arising under this part and § 6-51-301. The award so rendered shall be transmitted to the chancery court of the county in which the annexing municipality is situated, and thereupon shall be subject to review in accordance with §§ 29-5-113 — 29-5-115 and 29-5-118.

If the annexed territory is then being provided with a utility service by a state instrumentality that has outstanding bonds or other obligations payable from the revenues derived from the sale of such utility service, the agreement or arbitration award referred to in subsections (a) and (b) shall also provide that:

The municipality will operate the utility property in such territory and account for the revenues therefrom in such manner as not to impair the obligations of contract with reference to such bonds or other obligations; or

The municipality will assume the operation of the entire utility system of such state instrumentality and the payment of such bonds or other obligations in accordance with their terms.

Such agreement or arbitration award shall fully preserve and protect the contract rights vested in the holders of such outstanding bonds or other obligations.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if a private individual or business entity provides utility service within the boundaries of a municipality under the terms of a privilege, franchise, license, or agreement granted or entered into by the municipality, and if the municipality annexes territory that includes the service area of a utility district, then such private individual or business entity and the utility district shall attempt to reach agreement in writing for allocation and conveyance to such private individual or business entity of any or all public functions, rights, duties, property, assets, and liabilities of such utility district that justice and reason may require in the circumstances. If an agreement is not reached, then notwithstanding the change of municipal boundaries, the service area of the utility district shall remain unchanged, and such private individual or business entity shall not provide utility service in the service area of the utility district.

Nothing in subdivision (d)(1) shall be construed to diminish the authority of any municipality to annex.

If at the time of annexation, the annexed territory is being provided with utility service by a municipal utility system or other state instrumentality, including but not limited to, a utility district, the annexing municipality shall, by delivering written notice of its election to the municipal utility system or other state instrumentality, have the right to purchase all or any part of the utility system of the municipal utility system or other state instrumentality then providing utility service to the area being annexed that the annexing municipality has elected to serve under this section. The purchase price shall be a price agreed upon by the parties for the properties comprising the utility system, or part thereof, that is being acquired and payment of such purchase price shall be on terms agreed to by the parties. In the event the parties cannot agree on a purchase price, then a final determination of the fair market value of the properties being acquired and all other outstanding issues related to the provision of utility services in the annexed area shall be made using the arbitration provisions of subsection (b); provided, that the arbitrator or arbitrators shall be a person or persons experienced and qualified to value public utility properties and any such arbitrator or arbitrators shall be agreed upon by the parties. If the parties cannot agree, the selection of an arbitrator shall be as otherwise provided by the laws of arbitration of this state. Such method and determination shall be the sole means by which the annexing municipality may acquire the facilities of a municipal utility or other state instrumentality located in the annexed territory.

Acts 1955, ch. 113, § 9; 1957, ch. 381, § 1; 1968, ch. 413, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-318; Acts 1993, ch. 375, § 1; 1998, ch. 586, § 1; 2003, ch. 93, § 1; 2015, ch. 512, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18 provided that the act take effect at 12:01 a.m. on May 16, 2015. However, the governor signed the act and it became law on May 20, 2015. Pursuant to Article II, § 20, of the Constitution of Tennessee, the act takes effect 40 days after the bill became law. Thus, the effective date of the act is June 29, 2015.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “Upon adoption of an annexation ordinance or” at the beginning of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18. June 29, 2015 [See the Compiler's Notes.].

Cross-References. Arbitration, title 29, ch. 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 17, 19, 71.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — 1960 Tennessee Survey (James C. Kirby, Jr.), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1021 (1960).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of city to charge franchise fee to a private company providing utility service in newly annexed territory, where that territory is in the service area of a utility district, OAG 07-086, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 86 (6/1/07).

Power of a city to acquire ownership of a water utility district, OAG 07-124 (8/16/07).

Application of Tenn. Const., art. II, § 9, to a local government investing in a mutual fund organized as a business trust that invests in assets authorized under Tennessee law, OAG 07-125, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 125 (8/17/07).

Municipality’s right to provide water services in annexed territory; conflict between T.C.A. §§ 5-6-120 and 6-51-111 and implied repeal of T.C.A. § 5-6-120 by T.C.A. § 6-51-111(e) to the extent of the inconsistency between the two statutes. OAG 14-19, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/14/14).

Providing natural gas within city limits. OAG 14-42, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 43 (4/1/14).

6-51-112. Electric cooperatives.

Notwithstanding any other statute, if the annexing municipality owns and operates its own electric system, it shall either offer to purchase any electric distribution properties and service rights within the annexed area owned by any electric cooperative, or grant such cooperative a franchise to serve the annexed area, as follows:

The municipality shall notify the affected electric cooperative in writing of the boundaries of the annexed area and shall indicate such area on appropriate maps;

The municipality shall offer to purchase the electric distribution properties of the cooperative located within the annexed area, together with all of the cooperative's rights to serve within such area, for a cash consideration, which shall consist of:

The present-day reproduction cost, new, of the facilities being acquired, less depreciation computed on a straight-line basis; plus

An amount equal to the cost of constructing any necessary facilities to reintegrate the system of the cooperative outside the annexed area after detaching the portion to be sold; plus

An annual amount, payable each year for a period of ten (10) years, equal to the sum of:

Twenty-five percent (25%) of the revenues received from power sales to consumers of electric power within the annexed area, except consumers with large industrial power loads greater than three hundred kilowatts (300kW), during the last twelve (12) months preceding the date of the notice provided for in subdivision (a)(1); and

Fifty percent (50%) of the net revenues, which is gross power sales revenues less wholesale cost of power including facilities rental charge, received from power sales to consumers with large industrial power loads greater than three hundred kilowatts (300kW) within the annexed area during the last twelve (12) months preceding the date of the notice provided for in subdivision (a)(1);

The electric cooperative, within ninety (90) days after receipt of an offer by the annexing municipality to purchase the cooperative's electric distribution properties and service rights within the annexed area, shall signify in writing its acknowledgement of the offer, and the parties shall proceed to act. The annexing municipality shall then be obligated to buy and pay for, and the cooperative shall be obligated to sell to the municipality, such properties and rights free and clear of all mortgage liens and encumbrances for the cash consideration computed and payable as provided in subdivision (a)(2);

The annexing municipality, if it elects not to make the offer to purchase as provided for in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2), shall grant to the cooperative a franchise to serve within the annexed area, for a period of not less than five (5) years, and the municipality shall thereafter renew or extend the franchise or grant new franchises for similar subsequent periods; provided, that upon expiration of any such franchise, the municipality may elect instead to make an offer to buy the cooperative's electric distribution properties and service rights as they then exist in accordance with and subject to subdivisions (a)(1) and (2); provided further, that, during the term of any such franchise, the annexing municipality shall be entitled to serve only such electric customers or locations within the annexed area as it served on the date when such annexation became effective;

If any annexing municipality contracts its boundaries so as to exclude from its corporate limits any territory, the cooperative may elect within sixty (60) days thereafter to purchase from such municipality, and such municipality shall thereupon sell and convey to the cooperative, the electric distribution properties and service rights of the municipality in any part of the excluded area that the electric cooperative had previously served, upon the same procedures set forth in subdivisions (a)(1)-(4) for acquisitions by municipalities;

Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit municipalities and any cooperative from buying, selling, or exchanging electric distribution properties, service rights and other rights, property, and assets by mutual agreement;

The territorial areas lying outside municipal boundaries served by municipal and cooperative electric systems will remain the same as generally established by power facilities already in place or legal agreements on March 6, 1968, and new consumers locating in any unserved areas between the respective power systems shall be served by the power system whose facilities were nearest on March 6, 1968, except to the extent that territorial areas are revised in accordance with this section; and

“Electric distribution properties,” as used in this section, means all electric lines and facilities used or useful in serving ultimate consumers, but does not include lines and facilities that are necessary for integration and operation of portions of a cooperative's electric system that are located outside the annexed area.

The methods of allocation and conveyance of property and property rights of any electric cooperative to any annexing municipality provided for in subsection (a) shall be exclusively available to such annexing municipality and to such electric cooperative notwithstanding § 7-52-105 or any other title or section of the code in conflict or conflicting herewith.

Acts 1968, ch. 413, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., § 6-320.

Cross-References. Provisions in section unaffected by rural electric and community services cooperative provisions, § 65-25-226.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 17, 19.

6-51-113. Provisions supplemental.

Except as specifically provided in this part, the powers conferred by this part shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other general, special, or local law, and the limitations imposed by this part shall not affect such powers.

Acts 1955, ch. 113, § 12; T.C.A., §§ 6-320, 6-321.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 13.

6-51-114. Special census after annexation.

In the event any area is annexed to any municipality, the municipality may have a special census and in any county having a population of not less than two hundred seventy-six thousand (276,000) nor more than two hundred seventy-seven thousand (277,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the municipality shall have such special census within the annexed area taken by the federal bureau of the census or in a manner directed by and satisfactory to the department of economic and community development, in which case the population of such municipality shall be changed and revised so as to include the population of the annexed area as shown by such supplemental census. The population of such municipality as so changed and revised shall be its population for the purpose of computing such municipality's share of all funds and moneys distributed by the state among the municipalities of the state on a population basis, and the population of such municipality as so revised shall be used in computing the aggregate population of all municipalities of the state, effective on the next July 1 following the certification of such supplemental census results to the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1953, ch. 121, § 1 (Williams, § 3321.1); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-303; Acts 1981, ch. 278, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Census, § 1.

6-51-115. Receipt and distribution of tax revenues.
[Effective until July 1, 2021. See the version effective on July 1, 2021.]

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, whenever a municipality extends its boundaries by annexation, the county or counties in which the municipality is located shall continue to receive the revenue from all state and local taxes distributed on the basis of situs of collection, generated within the annexed area, until July 1 following the annexation, unless the annexation takes effect on July 1.

If the annexation takes effect on July 1, then the municipality shall begin receiving revenue from such taxes generated within the annexed area for the period beginning July 1.

Whenever a municipality extends its boundaries by annexation, the municipality shall notify the department of revenue of such annexation upon the annexation becoming effective, for the purpose of tax administration.

Such taxes shall include the local sales tax authorized in § 67-6-702, the wholesale beer tax authorized in § 57-6-103, the income tax on dividends authorized in § 67-2-102, and all other such taxes distributed to counties and municipalities based on the situs of their collection.

In addition to subsection (a), when a municipality annexes territory in which there is retail or wholesale activity at the time the annexation takes effect or within three (3) months after the annexation date, the following shall apply:

Notwithstanding § 57-6-103 or any other law to the contrary, for wholesale activity involving the sale of beer, the county shall continue to receive annually an amount equal to the amount received by the county in the twelve (12) months immediately preceding the effective date of the annexation for beer establishments in the annexed area that produced wholesale beer tax revenues during that entire twelve (12) months. For establishments that produced wholesale beer tax revenues for at least one (1) month but less than the entire twelve-month period, the county shall continue to receive an amount annually determined by averaging the amount of wholesale beer tax revenue produced during each full month the establishment was in business during that time and multiplying this average by twelve (12). For establishments that did not produce revenue before the annexation date but produced revenue within three (3) months after the annexation date, and for establishments that produced revenue for less than a full month prior to annexation, the county shall continue to receive annually an amount determined by averaging the amount of wholesale beer tax revenue produced during the first three (3) months the establishment was in operation and multiplying this average by twelve (12). This subdivision (b)(1) is subject to the exceptions in subsection (c). A municipality shall only pay the county the amount required by this subdivision (b)(1), for a period of fifteen (15) years.

Notwithstanding § 67-6-712 or any other law to the contrary, for retail activity subject to the 1963 Local Option Revenue Act, compiled in title 67, chapter 6, part 7, the county shall continue to receive annually an amount equal to the amount of revenue the county received pursuant to § 67-6-712(a)(2)(A) in the twelve (12) months immediately preceding the effective date of the annexation for business establishments in the annexed area that produced 1963 Local Option Revenue Act revenue during that entire twelve (12) months. For business establishments that produced such revenues for more than a month but less than the full twelve-month period, the county shall continue to receive an amount annually determined by averaging the amount of local option revenue produced by the establishment and allocated to the county under § 67-6-712(a)(2)(A) during each full month the establishment was in business during that time and multiplying this average by twelve (12). For business establishments that did not produce revenue before the annexation date and produced revenue within three (3) months after the annexation date, and for establishments that produced revenue for less than a full month prior to annexation, the county shall continue to receive annually an amount determined by averaging the amount of the 1963 Local Option Revenue Act produced and allocated to the county under § 67-6-712(a)(2)(A) during the first three (3) months the establishment was in operation and multiplying this average by twelve (12). This subdivision (b)(2) is subject to the exceptions in subsection (c). A municipality shall only pay the county the amount required by this subdivision (b)(2), for a period of fifteen (15) years.

Subsection (b) is subject to these exceptions:

Subdivision (b)(1) ceases to apply as of the effective date of the repeal of the wholesale beer tax, should this occur;

Subdivision (b)(2) ceases to apply as of the effective date of the repeal of the 1963 Local Option Revenue Act, compiled in title 67, chapter 6, part 7, should this occur;

Should the general assembly reduce the amount of revenue from the Wholesale Beer Tax, compiled in title 57, chapter 6, part 1, or the 1963 Local Option Revenue Act accruing to municipalities by changing the distribution formula, the amount of revenue accruing to the county under subsection (b) will be reduced proportionally as of the effective date of the reduction;

A county, by resolution of its legislative body, may waive its rights to receive all or part of the revenues provided by subsection (b). In these cases, the revenue shall be distributed as provided in §§ 57-6-103 and 67-6-712 of the respective tax laws unless otherwise provided by agreement between the county and municipality; and

Annual revenues paid to a county by or on behalf of the annexing municipality are limited to the annual revenue amounts provided in subsection (b) and known as “annexation date revenue” as defined in subdivision (d)(2). Annual situs-based revenues in excess of the “annexation date revenue” allocated to one (1) or more counties shall accrue to the annexing municipality. Any decrease in the revenues from the situs-based taxes identified in subsection (b) shall not affect the amount remitted to the county or counties pursuant to subsection (b), except as otherwise provided in this subsection (c); provided, that a municipality may petition the department of revenue no more often than annually to adjust annexation date revenue as a result of the closure or relocation of a tax producing entity.

It is the responsibility of the county within which the annexed territory lies to certify and to provide to the department a list of all tax revenue producing entities within the proposed annexation area.

The department shall determine the local share of revenue from each tax listed in this section generated within the annexed territory for the year before the annexation becomes effective, subject to the requirements of subsection (b). This revenue shall be known as the “annexation date revenue.”

The department, with respect to the revenues described in subdivision (b)(2), and the municipality, with respect to the revenues described in subdivision (b)(1), shall annually distribute an amount equal to the annexation date revenue to the county of the annexed territory.

Acts 1988, ch. 1016, § 1; 1998, ch. 1101, § 24; 2004, ch. 959, §§ 52, 53; 2005, ch. 311, § 2; 2012, ch. 837, § 1.

Cross-References. Alcoholic beverage gross receipts taxes, distribution, § 57-4-306.

Income tax, distribution of revenue, § 67-2-119.

1963 Local Option Revenue Act, distribution of revenue, § 67-6-702.

Wholesale beer tax, levy and distribution, § 57-6-103.

Attorney General Opinions. Effective date of annexation for purposes of local sales tax distribution under subdivision (b)(2) of this section, OAG 04-037, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 37 (3/12/04).